scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_oo.yaml
     apiichisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apiichisidoon
     apiitagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapiitagoodoon
     apiitagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indapiitagoodoon
     apiitagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapiitagoodoon
     apiitagoodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apiitagoodood
     apiitagoodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epiitagoodood
     apiitagoodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apiitagoodoon
     apiitaawangisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapiitaawangisidoon
     apiitaawangisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapiitaawangisidoon
     apiitaawangisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apiitaawangisidood
     apiitaawangisidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epiitaawangisidood
     apiitaawangisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apiitaawangisidoon
     asigisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indasigisidoon
     asigisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odasigisidoon
     asigisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: asigisidood
     asigisidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: esigisidood
     asigisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: asigisidoon
     ashidaakobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indashidaakobidoon
     ashidaakobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odashidaakobidoon
     ashidaakobidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ashidaakobidood
     ashidaakobidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: eshidaakobidood
     ashidaakobidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: ashidaakobidoon
     ashidaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indashidaakosidoon
     ashidaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odashidaakosidoon
     ashidaakosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ashidaakosidood
     ashidaakosidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: eshidaakosidood
     ashidaakosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: ashidaakosidoon
     atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indatoon
     atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindatoon
     atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidatoon
     atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odatoon
     atoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: atood
     atoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: etood
     atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: atoon
     atoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0: atooyok
     atoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: atoodaa
     azhe-atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindazhe-atoon
     azhe-atoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: azhe-atood
     azhe-atoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odazhe-atoon
     azhe-atoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: azhe-atood
     azhe-atoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ezhe-atood
     azhebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indazhebidoon
     azhebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindazhebidoon
     azhebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidazhebidoon
     azhebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odazhebidoon
     azhebidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: azhebidood
     azhebidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ezhebidood
     azhebidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: azhebidoon
     azhesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indazhesidoon
     azhesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odazhesidoon
     azhesidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: azhesidood
     azhesidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ezhesidood
     azhesidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: azhesidoon
     azhewidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indazhewidoon
     azhewidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odazhewidoon
     azhewidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: azhewidood
     azhewidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ezhewidood
     azhewidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: azhewidoon
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaaba'oodoon
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaba'oodoon
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaaba'oodoon
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaba'oodoon
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaba'oodood
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaaba'oodood
     aaba'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaba'oodoon
     aabajitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaabajitoon
     aabajitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabajitoon
     aabajitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabajitoon
     aabajitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabajitoon
     aabajitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabajitood
     aabajitoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabajitood
     aabajitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabajitoon
     aabibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabibidoon
     aabibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabibidoon
     aabibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabibidoon
     aabibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabibidoon
     aabibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabibidoon
     aabibidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabibidood
     aabibidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabibidood
     aabibidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabibidoon
     aabiskobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabiskobidoon
     aabiskobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabiskobidoon
     aabiskobidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabiskobidood
     aabiskobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabiskobidoon
     aabiskobidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabiskobidood
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabitoobadoon
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabitoobadoon
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabitoobadoon
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabitoobadoon
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabitoobadood
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabitoobadood
     aabitoobadoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabitoobadoon 
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaabitooshkinadoon
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabitooshkinadoon
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabitooshkinadoon
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabitooshkinadoon
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabitooshkinadood
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabitooshkinadood
     aabitooshkinadoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabitooshkinadoon 
     aabitooshkinatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabitooshkinatoon
     aabitooshkinatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabitooshkinadoon
     aabitooshkinatoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabitooshkinatood
     aabitooshkinatoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabitooshkinatoon
     aabiinjitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabiinjitoon
     aabiinjitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: oyaabiinjitoon
     aabiinjitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabiinjitood
     aabiinjitoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabiinjitood
     aabiinjitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabiinjitoon
     aabiinjitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: gego aabiinjitooken
     aaboojibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaaboojibidoon
     aaboojibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaaboojibidoon
     aaboojibidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboojibidoon
     aaboojibidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboojibidood
     aaboojibidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaaboojibidood
     aaboojibidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboojibidoon
     aaboojisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaaboojisidoon
     aaboojisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboojisidoon
     aaboojisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboojisidood
     aaboojisidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaaboojisidood
     aaboojisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboojisidoon
     aandagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaandagoodoon
     aandagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandagoodoon
     aandagoodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aandagoodood
     aandagoodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aandagoodoon
     aandakidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaandakidoon
     aandakidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandakidoon
     aandakidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aandakidood
     aandakidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aandakidoon
     aandapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaandapidoon
     aandapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0: niyaandapidoon
     aandapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandapidoon
     aandapidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aandapidood
     aandapidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaandapidood
     aandapidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aandapidoon
     aanikoobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanikoobidoon
     aanikoobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanikoobidoon
     aanikoobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanikoobidoon
     aanikoobidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanikoobidood
     aanikoobidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanikoobidood
     aanikoobidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanikoobidoon
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanikoosidoon
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanikoosidoon
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanikoosidoon
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaanikoosidoon
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanikoosidoon
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanikoosidood
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanikoosidood
     aanikoosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanikoosidoon 
     aanikootoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanikootoon
     aanikootoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanikootoon
     aanikootoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanikootood
     aanikootoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanikootoon
     aanikootoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanikootoon
     aanimitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanimitoon
     aanimitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanimitoon
     aanimitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaanimitoon
     aanimitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanimitoon
     aanimitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanimitood
     aanimitoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanimitood
     aanimitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanimitoon
     aanjisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanjisidoon
     aanjisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanjisidoon
     aanjisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjisidoon
     aanjisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjisidood
     aanjisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanjisidoon
     aanjitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanjitoon
     aanjitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanjitoon
     aanjitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaanjitoon
     aanjitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjitoon
     aanjitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjitood
     aanjitoon+VTI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanjitood
     aanjitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanjitoon 
     aanjiwidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanjiwidoon
     aanjiwidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjiwidoon
     aanjiwidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjiwidood
     aanjiwidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanjiwidoon
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanzinaagotoon
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanzinaagotoon
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaanzinaagotoon
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanzinaagotoon
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanzinaagotood
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanzinaagotood
     aanzinaagotoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanzinaagotoon
     aapida'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaapida'oodoon
     aapida'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaapida'oodoon
     aapida'oodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aapida'oodood
     aapida'oodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaapida'oodood
     aapida'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aapida'oodoon
     aapidapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaapidapidoon
     aapidapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaapidapidoon
     aapidapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaapidapidoon
     aapidapidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aapidapidood
     aapidapidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaapidapidood
     aapidapidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aapidapidoon
     aasamaatesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaasamaatesidoon
     aasamaatesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaasamaatesidoon
     aasamaatesidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aasamaatesidood
     aasamaatesidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aasamaatesidoon
     aasamisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaasamisidoon
     aasamisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaasamisidoon
     aasamisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aasamisidood
     aasamisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aasamisidoon
     aasosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaasosidoon
     aasosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaasosidoon
     aasosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aasosidood
     aasosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: aasosidoon
     aaswaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaswaakosidoon
     aaswaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaswaakosidoon
     aaswaakosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaswaakosidood
     aaswaakosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaskwaakosidoon
     aaswaakosidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaaswaakosidood
     aaswaakosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaswaakosidoon
     aatawebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaatawebidoon
